Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 16 State Officers
25-16-519. Warrants — Issuance of duplicates.

Whenever Auditor of State's warrants of the State of Arkansas issued to any person are lost or destroyed, the owner or person entitled to receive the contents of the lost or destroyed warrants shall be entitled to have them duplicated by the Auditor of State upon satisfactory proof or evidence to the Auditor of State that:

The warrants alleged to have been so lost or destroyed were actually issued to the person as alleged in the application to him or her;

The warrants have not been paid by the Treasurer of State;

The person making the application is legally authorized or entitled to receive the contents of the warrants; and

The warrants have been lost or destroyed.

The evidence must show how and in what manner the loss or destruction occurred, the date and number of the lost or destroyed warrants, and whether they bore interest or not.

The evidence required by subsection (a) of this section shall be duly sworn to and subscribed by the person entitled to receive the contents of the warrants, or some person for him or her. This person or the person acting for him or her shall also execute and file with the Auditor of State his or her bond to the State of Arkansas with good and sufficient security to be approved by the Auditor of State in a sum not less than double the amount of the warrants claimed to be lost. The bond shall be conditioned that he or she will save and keep harmless the State of Arkansas against any payment of the warrants which the state may thereafter be compelled to make to a bona fide holder of the warrants.

Upon compliance with the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, it shall be the duty of the Auditor of State to issue and deliver to the applicant, or his or her agent or attorney, a duplicate for the warrant so adjudged to have been lost or destroyed. The duplicate warrant and endorsement shall entitle the holder to receive from the Treasurer of State the amount specified in the duplicate warrant, in like manner as upon an original warrant.

The Auditor of State shall review the bonding procedures for the issuance of duplicate warrants and shall issue rules on the adequate bonding of all payees on duplicate warrants to preserve and protect the expenditure of state funds.

The bonding requirements shall not apply to a person who is acting in his or her capacity as an official officer or authorized representative of state or local government, including school districts, and when that person is covered under the provisions of the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program under § 21-2-701 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

Preambles. Acts 1853, p. 127 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, it is proper that the Governor should have in his possession the reports of the various state officers, showing the condition of the affairs of the state, to enable him to prepare his message to the General Assembly, with convenience, and based on official information; therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1844, p. 29, § 13: effective on passage.

Acts 1853, p. 127, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1866, No. 4, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1881, No. 97, § 2: became law without Governor's signature, Apr. 9, 1881.

Acts 1883, No. 17, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1883, No. 107, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1885, No. 131, § 7: effective on passage.

Acts 1891, No. 46, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1983, No. 697, § 3[4]: Mar. 23, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that procedures are needed whereby the State Treasurer may obtain reimbursement on any uncollectible State warrants or checks received by the Office in a normal course of business, and that the methods set forth in this Act will provide a procedure whereby the State Treasurer may obtain such reimbursement in a businesslike manner; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable the State Treasurer to perform the duties of said Office in a businesslike manner. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2017, No. 291, § 3: June 30, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act amends the dates of the Treasurer of State's reporting requirements in an effort to achieve more accurate and efficient reporting; that the next reporting cycle begins at the beginning of the next fiscal year on July 1, 2017; that it is in the best interests of the state to have accurate and efficient reporting by the Treasurer of State; that the provisions of this act should be effective before the next billing cycle to allow the Treasurer of State to implement this act; and that this act is necessary because it will allow for the Treasurer of State to provide more accurate and efficient reporting in the next reporting cycle. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

ALR.

Validity, construction, and effect of state statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees. 51 A.L.R.4th 702.

Am. Jur. 72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, § 64.

C.J.S. 81A C.J.S., States, § 135.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 35, §§ 1, 2, p. 113; 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 34, § 1, p. 37; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4474-4476; Pope's Dig., §§ 5510-5512; Acts 1953, No. 55, § 1; 1983, No. 697, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-530 — 12-532; Acts 1989, No. 416, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2924.

Subchapter 6

— Treasurer of State

25-16-601. Violation of law by Treasurer of State.

If the Treasurer of State shall willfully neglect or refuse to perform any duty enjoined by law, or shall be guilty of any oppression or extortion in the performance of any legal duty, or shall receive any fee or reward for the performance of any legal duty not allowed by law, or shall by color of his or her office knowingly do any act not authorized by law, or shall use any of the moneys belonging to the state, or shall perform any other duty of his or her office in any other manner than is required by law, then he or she shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor in office and on conviction shall forfeit for the use of the state any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 34; C. & M. Dig., § 2812; Pope's Dig., § 3530; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-628.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 34, is also codified as §25-16-501.

25-16-602. Seal.

The Treasurer of State shall keep a seal of office which shall be used to authenticate all writings, papers, and documents required by law to be certified from his or her office.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 4483; Pope's Dig., § 5519; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-604.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 6, is also codified as §25-16-503.

25-16-603. Deputies.

The Treasurer of State is authorized to appoint two (2) deputies. The appointments shall be made in writing.

Each deputy so appointed shall take the oath prescribed by law. The oath shall be endorsed on the letter of appointment, and the letter of appointment shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

The Treasurer of State shall be responsible on his or her official bond for all the acts done and performed by his or her deputies in the performance of their official duties.

Every deputy appointed under the provisions of this section shall possess all the powers of his or her principal and may perform any of the duties required by law to be performed by his or her principal.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1866, No. 4, §§ 1 and 2, are also codified as §25-16-504.

Cited: State v. Newton, 33 Ark. 276 (1878).

History.

Acts 1866, No. 4, §§ 1, 2, p. 20; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4484, 4486; Pope's Dig., §§ 5520, 5522; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-605, 12-606; Acts 1991, No. 531, § 1.

25-16-604. Duties generally.

It shall be the duty of the Treasurer of State:

To receive and keep all the moneys of the state not expressly required by law to be kept by some other person;

To disburse the public moneys upon warrants drawn upon the State Treasury according to law and not otherwise;

To keep a just, true, and comprehensive account of all moneys received and disbursed by him or her in books to be kept for that purpose, in which he or she shall state from whom moneys have been received and on what account and to whom and on what account disbursed;

To keep a just and true account of each head of appropriation made by law and the disbursements under them;

To render his or her accounts to the Auditor of State for settlement quarterly; and

To perform all other duties which may be required of him or her by law.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (6), deleted “regular” preceding “meeting” and “biennial” preceding “session” and substituted “the preceding year” for “the two (2) preceding years” in the first sentence; and deleted “biennial” preceding “report” in the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment deleted former (6), and redesignated former (7) as present (6).

Cross References. No money paid from treasury unless appropriated, Ark. Const., Art. 16, § 12.

Quarterly reports of Treasurer of State, §21-7-301.

Receipts for funds paid into State Treasury, §19-2-102.

State institutions, Treasurer of State not entitled to membership on boards of management, §25-17-203.

Statement of fees received to be included in regular report to Governor, §21-7-203.

Treasurer of State liable for fees received from other officers, §21-7-202.

Constitution does not require cash funds of state institutions and agencies derived from student fees, sale of farm produce, and dormitory charges, to be turned over to the state treasury. Gipson v. Ingram, 215 Ark. 812, 223 S.W.2d 595 (1949).

Treasurer of State did not waive his immunity to Rehabilitation Act of 1973 claims, 29 U.S.C. § 794, because the State Treasurer's Office did not accept federal assistance for itself and the Treasurer of State did not make use of federal funds but, as required by this section, held funds for other agencies in Arkansas that had accepted federal assistance.Singer v. Harris, 897 F.3d 970 (8th Cir. 2018).

Cited: State v. Newton, 33 Ark. 276 (1878).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 22; Acts 1853, § 1, p. 127; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4387, 4490; Pope's Dig., §§ 5399, 5526; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-302, 12-609; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 48; 2017, No. 291, § 2.

25-16-605. Access to other offices.

The Treasurer of State shall have free access to all the other offices of the state for the inspection, concerning his or her duties, of all books, accounts, and papers which they respectively contain.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 30; C. & M. Dig., § 4488; Pope's Dig., § 5524; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-612.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 30, is also codified as §25-16-506.

25-16-606. Power to administer oaths.

The Treasurer of State shall have power to administer oaths required or allowed by law in matters touching the duties of his or her office.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 29; C. & M. Dig., § 4487; Pope's Dig., § 5523; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-608.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 29, is also codified as §25-16-507.

25-16-607. Payment on Auditor of State's warrants.

The Treasurer of State is prohibited from paying any money out of the State Treasury on any account whatever except upon the lawful warrants of the Auditor of State.

No warrant shall be paid by the Treasurer of State unless the money has been previously appropriated by law, nor shall the amount paid under any one (1) head ever exceed the amount appropriated by law for that purpose.

Whenever there shall not be in the State Treasury a sufficient amount of money to pay all the warrants of the Auditor of State outstanding at the time, the Treasurer of State shall redeem the warrants in the order of their dates and numbers as issued. It shall be lawful for the Treasurer of State to pay any Auditor of State's warrant when the amount of money in the State Treasury is sufficient to redeem the warrant, as well as all other warrants of earlier date and number preceding it.

The Treasurer of State, when he or she pays any warrant drawn by the Auditor of State, shall write on the face of the warrant “redeemed”, to which he or she shall sign his or her name and the date thereof.

If the Treasurer of State shall willfully and unlawfully refuse to pay any warrant drawn upon the State Treasury, having funds on hand for that purpose, then he or she shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor in office and upon conviction shall be fined for the use of the state in any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100).

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 17, is also codified as §25-16-517.

Cross References. No money to be paid from treasury without appropriation, Ark. Const., Art. 16, § 12.

Cited: Dickinson v. Clibourn, 125 Ark. 101, 187 S.W. 909 (1916).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, §§ 17, 24, 33; Acts 1883, No. 107, § 2, p. 191; 1885, No. 131, § 4, p. 210; C. & M. Dig., §§ 2828, 4469, 4495, 4496; Pope's Dig., §§ 3546, 5505, 5531, 5532; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-613 — 12-617.

25-16-608. Issuance of certificates or scrip on Auditor of State's warrants.

It shall be unlawful for the Treasurer of State to issue new certificates or scrip upon warrants of the Auditor of State.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 131, § 2, p. 210; C. & M. Dig., § 4498; Pope's Dig., § 5534; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-618.

25-16-609. Claims for reimbursement on uncollectible state warrants or checks.

The Treasurer of State shall file a claim for reimbursement with the Arkansas State Claims Commission on any uncollectible state warrants or checks received by the office in a normal course of business.

Warrants or checks shall be considered uncollectible if all available legal action is taken without any satisfactory results for six (6) months after items become uncollectible and if the Attorney General is given notice of the nature of the claim at the time of the filing for reimbursement with the commission.

The reimbursement claim shall be payable from the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund of the commission for either controversial or noncontroversial claims on order of the commission.

If the award is greater than the limitation imposed by law upon the commission for the payment of a controversial or noncontroversial claim, then the reimbursement claim shall be referred to the General Assembly for an appropriation as in the case of other claims referred by the commission. This referral shall be handled by the commission.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the absence of a duty for the Treasurer of State to report railroad aid, levee bonds, or Holford bonds as part of the indebtedness of the state, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1276, § 7. This section was derived from Acts 1881, No. 97, § 1, p. 193; C. & M. Dig., § 4453; Pope's Dig., § 5488; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-512.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 697, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-619.1.

25-16-610. [Repealed.]

The Treasurer of State shall report quarterly to the Governor the amount of notes on hand and by whom drawn and the amount of moneys received and on hand on account of the sale of state lands.

History.

Acts 1844, § 5, p. 29; C. & M. Dig., § 4492; Pope's Dig., § 5528; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-611.

Publisher's Notes. This section may be obsolete. The rest of the 1844 act provided for sales on credit of internal improvement lands by land agents. The notes referred to are notes received for such lands. There are currently no provisions for such sales and the Commissioner of State Lands has charge of all sales of state lands.

25-16-612. Balancing books at end of term of appropriation.

It shall be the duty of the Treasurer of State, on the receipt of the report of the Auditor of State provided for in §25-16-515, to bring down a balance to the credit of each appropriation sufficient to cover the warrants issued and not paid during the term for which the appropriation was made, and, after the credits are given and books balanced, the balance shall then be covered into the State Treasury.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 17, § 2, p. 15; C. & M. Dig., § 4472; Pope's Dig., § 5508; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-619.

25-16-613. Letter book.

The Treasurer of State shall keep a letter book, in which he or she shall copy all official letters which may be written by him or her.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 31; C. & M. Dig., § 4489; Pope's Dig., § 5525; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-610.

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, § 31, is also codified as §25-16-511.

25-16-614. Examination of office.

The Governor shall be authorized and required to appoint and commission expert accountants to examine and report to the Governor the state of the Treasurer of State's office. The Governor may order an examination at his or her discretion provided he or she orders at least one (1) each year.

At least one (1) appointment of an accountant shall be made each year, and the number of accountants shall not exceed two (2).

The duties of accountants shall be to examine carefully and fully the books of the Treasurer of State, to count the cash belonging to the state on hand, and to prepare a complete printed statement of their labor. Accountants shall attach to this statement the following oath subscribed and sworn to by them:

“I do solemnly swear that I have made a complete examination of the books belonging to the office of the Treasurer of State for one (1) year last past, and counted the cash on hand, and the foregoing statement is true and correct, and I further swear that I did not directly nor indirectly inform anyone of my appointment nor of my intention to examine said books until I entered actively upon my duty.”

When the Governor appoints and commissions the accountants, he or she shall swear them not to divulge their appointments until they shall have entered upon the active duties of their office.

If the expert or accountant shall divulge, directly or indirectly, the fact that he or she has been appointed or commissioned to that office, or the time when the Governor has ordered the examination, he or she shall be deemed guilty of perjury and punished as in other cases.

The Governor is authorized to pay the accountants out of the contingent fund a sum of money not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for each examination made.

Upon the presentation of the accountant duly commissioned, the Treasurer of State shall give the accountant free access to his or her books and permit him or her to count the cash on hand.

On the refusal of the Treasurer of State to comply with the provisions of this section, his or her office shall be declared vacant and the offense deemed a felony, and on conviction thereof he or she shall be sentenced to the Division of Correction for a term not exceeding five (5) years.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (d).

Publisher's Notes. Rev. Stat., ch. 18, §§ 36-39, are also codified as §25-16-512.

Cross References. Attorney General not to hold other office, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 22.

State institutions, Attorney General not entitled to membership on boards of management, §25-17-203.

Preambles. Acts 1923, No. 157 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, more than two thousand individuals and corporations in Arkansas are annually delinquent in the payment of privilege, franchise, special license and other taxes; and

“Whereas, the law requires the Attorney General, upon such failure, to institute legal proceedings, if necessary, for the collection of such taxes; and

“Whereas, in a great number of instances the amounts due the state are exceedingly small and the collection of same by the Attorney General direct would result in heavy traveling expense to be paid by the state, and in preventing the Attorney General from remaining in his office and supervising and directing the work thereof properly; and

“Whereas, the amount of work in the office of the Attorney General is so heavy that it requires all the time of the entire office force, thus making it impossible to properly attend, in person, to the collection of the taxes aforesaid….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1857, p. 117, § 8: effective on passage.

Acts 1883, No. 45, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1883, No. 85, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1893, No. 145, § 6: effective on passage.

Acts 1911, No. 131, § 9: approved Mar. 24, 1911. Emergency declared.

Acts 1923, No. 157, § 7: Emergency declared.

Acts 1957, No. 91, § 6: Feb. 26, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that the Attorney General in order to more adequately represent the State of Arkansas in all matters in which the state's interests are concerned should have the power to subpoena witnesses for the purpose of investigation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 246, § 3: Feb. 24, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that it is essential for the best interest to the people of the State of Arkansas where is a difference of opinion between a Constitutional Officer and the Attorney General as to a conflict of interest between their Offices that the Constitutional Officer could engage and employ special counsel to represent him or her in his official capacity. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 46, § 20: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1993, No. 557, § 25: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 2009, No. 81, § 2: Feb. 2, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to augment the law enforcement duties and abilities of the Attorney General's office, facilitate the thorough investigation by the Attorney General's office of all matters in which state interests are concerned, and enhance the Attorney General's representation of the State of Arkansas in court and the Attorney General's enforcement of the laws of the State of Arkansas, that this act is immediately necessary for the continued successful operation of the Attorney General's office. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 819, § 26(a): May 1, 2021. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 3-17 and 20-24 of this act are effective on and after May 1, 2021”.

Acts 2019, No. 897, § 24: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2019 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2019 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2019”.

ALR.

Prosecutor's power to grant prosecution witness immunity from prosecution. 4 A.L.R.4th 1221.

Validity, construction, and effect of state statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees. 51 A.L.R.4th 702.

Investigative authority of administrative agencies in state regulation of securities. 58 A.L.R.5th 293.

Am. Jur. 7 Am. Jur. 2d, Atty. Gen., § 1 et seq.

C.J.S. 7A C.J.S., Atty. Gen., § 1 et seq.

History.

Acts 1891, No. 46, §§ 1-4, p. 76; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4513-4516; Pope's Dig., §§ 5570-5573; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-620 — 12-623; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 1024.

25-16-615. Examination of records by joint legislative committee.

Immediately after the commencement of each session of the General Assembly, it shall be the duty of the Treasurer of State to submit all accounts, books, vouchers, and other official documents in his or her office to a joint committee of the General Assembly for examination and settlement.

It shall be the duty of the committee to examine the books, accounts, vouchers, and other official documents of the Treasurer of State and make a report of the results of the examination to both houses of the General Assembly.

(1)If each house shall approve the report of the committee, an order shall be made directing the committee to cause the proper entries to be made in the books of the Treasurer of State, showing the results of the settlement.

If the committee shall make an unfavorable report upon finding that the Treasurer of State has not performed the duties required of him or her by law and if the report shall be approved by both houses of the General Assembly, an order shall be made directing the Governor to cause suit to be brought against the delinquent on his or her official bond.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 18, §§ 36-39; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4517-4520; Pope's Dig., §§ 5574-5577; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-624 — 12-627.

Subchapter 7

— Attorney General

25-16-701. Private practice of law prohibited.

During his or her term of office, the Attorney General shall not engage in the private practice of law, which shall include, but not be limited to, acting as office counsel, participating in litigation, and accepting retainers.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 251, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-701.1.